District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5701

Definition; authorized benefits and funds; governing provisions

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1310, ch. 854, § 749
Dec. 20, 1928, 45 Stat. 1055, ch. 40, § 1
Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-181, § 2, 39 DCR 8081
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-193, § 2, 39 DCR 9009
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1201.
1973 Ed., § 35-901.